Hawaii statutes.
[§115-3] Criteria for public rights-of-way.
A distance at reasonable intervals taking into consideration the topography and
physical characteristics of the land the public is desirous of reaching is
established as the maximum between public rights-of-way for the purposes of
this chapter. [L 1974, c 244, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next